District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-1219.09

Prohibition on political activity.

Repealed.

History

Sept. 11, 1998, D.C. Law 12-144, § 10, 45 DCR 3747
Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 103(a), 55 DCR 1689

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2295.9.